Utah statutes.
31A-37-401.   Sponsored captive insurance companies -- Formation.
(1)  One or more sponsors may form a sponsored captive insurance company under
this chapter.
(2)  A sponsored captive insurance company formed under this chapter may
establish and maintain a protected cell to insure risks of a participant if:
(a)  the shareholders of a sponsored captive insurance company are limited to:
(i)  the participants of the sponsored captive insurance company; and
(ii)  the sponsors of the sponsored captive insurance company;
(b)  each protected cell is accounted for separately on the books and records
of the sponsored captive insurance company to reflect:
(i)  the financial condition of the protected cell;
(ii)  the results of operations of the protected cell;
(iii)  the net income or loss of the protected cell;
(iv)  the dividends or other distributions to participants of the protected
cell; and
(v)  other factors that may be:
(A)  provided in the participant contract; or
(B)  required by the commissioner;
(c)  the assets of a protected cell are not chargeable with liabilities
arising out of any other insurance business the sponsored captive insurance
company may conduct;
(d)  a sale, exchange, or other transfer of assets is not made by the
sponsored captive insurance company between or among any of the protected
cells of the sponsored captive insurance company without the consent of the
protected cells;
(e)  a sale, exchange, transfer of assets, dividend, or distribution is not
made from a protected cell to a sponsor or participant without the
commissioner's approval, which may not be given if the sale, exchange,
transfer, dividend, or distribution would result in insolvency or impairment
with respect to a protected cell;
(f)  a sponsored captive insurance company annually files with the
commissioner financial reports the commissioner requires under Section
31A-37-106, including accounting statements detailing the financial experience
of each protected cell;
(g)  a sponsored captive insurance company notifies the commissioner in
writing within ten business days of a protected cell that is insolvent or
otherwise unable to meet the claim or expense obligations of the protected
cell;
(h)  a participant contract does not take effect without the commissioner's
prior written approval; and
(i)  the addition of each new protected cell and withdrawal of a participant
of any existing protected cell does not take effect without the commissioner's
prior written approval.
